Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.230

Waiver of notice.

(1) A director may waive any notice required by this title, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice, and such waiver shall be equivalent to the giving of such notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver must be in writing, executed by the director entitled to the notice, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

(2) A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any corporate action approved at the meeting.

[ 2020 c 57 s 60; 2009 c 189 s 25; 2002 c 297 s 30; 1989 c 165 s 94.]